th: รูปทรงเลนส์แว่นตา: ทรงกระบอก; ทรงกระบอกทอริก; แบน; แบนทอริก; ทรงกลม; ทอริก; อื่นๆ
nb: Form på brilleglass: Sylindrisk; Sylindrisk torisk; Flat; Flat torisk; Sfærisk; Torisk; Annet
ja: ゴーグルレンズのShapes: シリンドリカル; シリンドリカルトーリック; フラット; フラットトーリック; スフェリカル; トーリック; その他
es: Forma de lentes de gafas: Cilíndrico; Tórico cilíndrico; Plano; Tórico plano; Esférico; Tórico; Otra
pl: Kształt soczewki gogli: Cylindryczna; Cylindryczno-toryczna; Płaska; Płasko-toryczna; Sferyczna; Toryczna; Inny
fi: Suojalasien linssien muoto: Lieriömäinen; Lieriömäinen toorinen; Litteä; Litteä toorinen; Pallomainen; Toorinen; Muu
vi: Hình dạng tròng kính bảo hộ: Hình trụ; Toric hình trụ; Phẳng; Toric phẳng; Hình cầu; Toric; Khác
it: Forma delle lenti della maschera: Cilindrica; Cilindrica torica; Piatta; Piatta torica; Sferica; Torica; Altro
zh-TW: 護目鏡鏡片形狀: 柱面; 柱狀環面; 平面; 平坦環面; 球面; 環面; 其他
zh-CN: 护目镜镜片形状: 柱面; 柱面复曲面; 平面; 平复曲面; 球面; 复曲面; 其他
pt-BR: Formato das lentes dos óculos de proteção: Cilíndrica; Tórica cilíndrica; Plana; Tórica plana; Esférica; Tórica; Outro
ko: 고글 렌즈 형태: 원통형; 실린더리컬 토릭; 평면형; 플랫 토릭; 구면형; 토릭형; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik leća za naočale: Cilindrično; Cilindrično torično; Ravno; Ravno torično; Sferično; Torično; Ostalo
sk-SK: Tvar šošovky ochranných okuliarov: Cylindrický; Cylindrický torický; Plochý; Plochý torický; Sférický; Torický; Iné
cs: Tvar čoček ochranných brýlí: Cylindrický; Cylindrický torický; Plochý; Plochý torický; Sférický; Torický; Ostatní
nl: Bril lensvorm: Cilindrisch; Cilindrisch torisch; Plat; Plat torisch; Sferisch; Torisch; Anders
el: Σχήμα φακού προστατευτικών γυαλιών: Κυλινδρικός; Κυλινδρικός τορικός; Επίπεδος; Επίπεδος τορικός; Σφαιρικός; Τορικός; Άλλο
de: Form der Schutzbrillengläser: Zylindrisch; Zylindrisch-torisch; Flach; Flach-torisch; Sphärisch; Torisch; Andere
en: Goggle lens shape: Cylindrical; Cylindrical toric; Flat; Flat toric; Spherical; Toric; Other
sv: Linsform för skyddsglasögon: Cylindrisk; Cylindrisk torisk; Platt; Platt torisk; Sfärisk; Torisk; Annan
da: Form på beskyttelsesbriller: Cylindrisk; Cylindrisk torisk; Flad; Flad torisk; Sfærisk; Torisk; Anden
pt-PT: Forma da lente dos óculos: Cilíndrica; Tórica cilíndrica; Plana; Tórica plana; Esférica; Tórica; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika leče očal: Cilindrična; Cilindrično-torična; Ravna; Ravno-torična; Sferična; Torična; Drugo
hu: Szemüveglencse formák: Hengeres; Hengeres torikus; Lapos; Lapos torikus; Szférikus; Torikus; Egyéb
ru: Форма линзы очков: Цилиндрическая; Цилиндрически-торическая; Плоская; Плоско-торическая; Сферическая; Торическая; Другое
tr: Gözlük camı şekli: Silindirik; Silindirik torik; Düz; Düz torik; Küresel; Torik; Diğer
bg-BG: Форма на лещите на предпазните очила: Цилиндрична; Цилиндрична торична; Плоска; Плоска торична; Сферична; Торична; Друго
fr: Forme du verre des lunettes de protection: Cylindrique; Torique cylindrique; Plat; Torique plat; Sphérique; Torique; Autre
ro-RO: Forma lentilelor ochelarilor de protecție: Cilindric; Toric cilindric; Plat; Toric plat; Sferic; Toric; Altele
lt-LT: Akinių lęšio forma: Cilindrinė; Cilindrinė torinė; Plokščia; Plokščia torinė; Sferinė; Torinė; Kita